Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
FINANCE - WARRANTS

31-20-401. Warrants signed - countersigned - fund.

All warrants drawn upon the treasurer shall be signed by the mayor and countersigned by the clerk and shall state the particular fund or appropriation to which the same is chargeable and the person to whom payable. No money shall be drawn except as provided in this part 4; except that the governing body of a municipality may provide for the disbursement of money by check in lieu of by warrant.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1132, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1187, § 1, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-401 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-402. Funds - how used.

All moneys received on any special assessment shall be held by the treasurer as a special fund to be applied to the payment of the improvement for which the assessment was made. Said money shall be used for no purpose whatever other than to reimburse the city or town for money expended for such improvement. All moneys received for account of the general fund shall be held by the treasurer in the general fund and shall be used for no purpose other than that for which they were appropriated, collected, or received except to reimburse any special fund to which the general fund may be indebted.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1132, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-402 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-403. Warrant endorsed when no funds - new warrant.

When a city or town warrant is received by the treasurer or collector and there is no money in the treasury to pay the same, he is directed to endorse on it the amount for which it was received and the date thereof, and from that date the warrant is to be regarded as canceled and cannot be reissued; but when the warrant amounts to more than is to be paid by the person presenting it, the treasurer or collector shall give him a certificate of the balance due him, which certificate, on presentation to the board authorized to audit claims for the city or town, entitles the holder to receive a new warrant for the amount specified therein.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1133, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-403 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-404. Registry of orders - contents - inspection.

Every treasurer of any city or town shall keep in his office a book, to be called the registry of city or town orders, in which shall be entered, at the date of the presentation thereof and without any interval or blank line between any such entry and the one preceding it, every city or town order, warrant, or other certificate of such town or city indebtedness presented to such town or city treasurer at any time for payment, whether the same is paid at the time of presentation or not, the number and date of such order, warrant, or certificate, the amount, the date of presentation, the name of the person presenting the same, and the particular fund, if any, upon which the order is drawn. Every such registry of city or town orders shall be open at all reasonable hours to the inspection and examination of any person desiring to inspect or examine the same.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1133, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-404 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-405. Order warrants paid.

Every fund in the hands of any treasurer of any such city or town of this state for disbursement shall be paid out in the order in which the orders drawn thereon, payable out of the same, are presented for payment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1133, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-405 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-406. Redemption of warrants.

When the treasurer of any city or town has any city or town funds on hand in cash to the amount of five hundred dollars or over, it is his duty to immediately apply all such funds to the redemption of an equal amount of such outstanding city or town warrants, certificates, or orders, with the interest due thereon, as may be entitled to a preference as to payment according to the order of time in which they were previously presented to the treasurer of such city or town, as evidenced by the registry of the orders of such city or town kept in his office as provided by law. For this purpose, he shall cause to be advertised for thirty days in some newspaper published in or nearest such city or town a notice that he will redeem such certain city or town orders, certificates, or warrants with interest due thereon, stating their number and amounts on presentation at the treasury of such city or town, and that, at the expiration of thirty days from the date of such notice, such orders, certificates, or warrants shall cease to bear interest.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1133, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-406 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-407. Neglect in keeping register or paying - penalty.

Any city or town treasurer, or city or town treasurer's deputy, who fails or neglects to keep such registry or who fails or neglects to register any warrant or certificate of indebtedness of such city or town as is entitled to registry or neglects or refuses to pay such warrants or certificates in order of payments, there being then money in the treasury applicable to the payment thereof or from which the same ought to be paid, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1133, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3256, § 542, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-407 as it existed prior to 1975.